apertium-es-ca.ca.dix
    <pardef n="el__detnt">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="detnt"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a_reveure__ij">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="ij"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BBC__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BBVA__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="IRPF__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ATS__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="EUA__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="MTS__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="FARC__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="escombraries__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="senyor__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>


   <pardef n="pres__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="poss/ès__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>esses</l> 
        <r>ès<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>essa</l> 
        <r>ès<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>essos</l> 
        <r>ès<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ès</l> 
        <r>ès<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>és</l> 
        <r>ès<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sacerdot__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>esses</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>essa</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rei__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nes</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>na</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fi__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ns</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ns</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="accessibilitat__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="clau__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gos__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ses</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sa</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sos</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="alcalde__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sses</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ssa</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mag__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ues</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gal__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>·les</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>·la</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="atletisme__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="campus__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pols__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>os</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="càries__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e r="LR" lm="el"><i>el</i><par n="el__detnt"/></e>
<e lm="bon dia"><i>bon<b/>dia</i><par n="a_reveure__ij"/></e>
<e lm="fotre"><i>fotre</i><par n="a_reveure__ij"/></e>
<e lm="qui-sap-lo"><i>qui-sap-lo</i><par n="a_reveure__ij"/></e>
<e lm="cambra legislativa"><p><l>cambres<b/>legislatives</l><r>cambra<b/>legislativa</r></p><par n="escombraries__n"/></e>
<e lm="clau"><i>clau</i><par n="clau__n"/></e>
<e lm="diable"><i>diable</i><par n="alcalde__n"/></e>
<e lm="fi"><i>fi</i><par n="fi__n"/></e>
<e lm="gal"><i>gal</i><par n="gal__n"/></e>
<e lm="gos"><i>gos</i><par n="gos__n"/></e>
<e lm="instructor"><i>instructor</i><par n="senyor__n"/></e>
<e lm="llum"><i>llum</i><par n="clau__n"/></e>
<e lm="mag"><i>mag</i><par n="mag__n"/></e>
<e lm="metge"><i>metge</i><par n="alcalde__n"/></e>
<e lm="necròpoli"><i>necròpoli</i><par n="accessibilitat__n"/></e>
<e lm="part"><i>part</i><par n="clau__n"/></e>
<e lm="pols"><i>pols</i><par n="pols__n"/></e>
<e lm="rei"><i>rei</i><par n="rei__n"/></e>
<e lm="rus"><i>rus</i><par n="gos__n"/></e>
<e lm="sacerdot"><i>sacerdot</i><par n="sacerdot__n"/></e>
<e lm="ós"><i>ós</i><par n="gos__n"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="el"><p><l><a/>el</l>                <r>el</r></p><par n="el__detnt"/></e>
<e lm="OMS" a=" alseoane@gmail.com"><i>OMS</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="otitis" a="mikel" c="Ángel"><i>otitis</i><par n="càries__n"/></e>
<e lm="pedagog"><i>pedagog</i><par n="mag__n"/></e>
<e lm="literat" a="prompsit2adn"><i>literat</i><par n="senyor__n"/></e>
<e lm="possès" a="prompsit2adn"><i>poss</i><par n="poss/ès__n"/></e>
<e lm="pròfug" a="prompsit2adn"><i>pròfug</i><par n="mag__n"/></e>
<e lm="receptivitat" a="prompsit2adn"><i>receptivitat</i><par n="accessibilitat__n"/></e>
<e lm="Tedax" a="prompsit2adn"><i>Tedax</i><par n="EUA__n"/></e>
<e lm="GMT" a="prompsit2adn"><i>GMT</i><par n="BBVA__n"/></e>
<e lm="Farc" a="prompsit2adn"><i>Farc</i><par n="FARC__n"/></e>
<e lm="PS" a="prompsit2adn"><i>PS</i><par n="IRPF__n"/></e>
<e lm="PJ" a="prompsit2adn"><i>PJ</i><par n="MTS__n"/></e>
<e lm="UME" a="prompsit2adn"><i>UME</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="MTV" a="prompsit2adn"><i>MTV</i><par n="EUA__n"/></e>
<e lm="PKK" a="prompsit2adn"><i>PKK</i><par n="BBVA__n"/></e>
<e lm="PGE" a="prompsit2adn"><i>PGE</i><par n="EUA__n"/></e>
<e lm="IP" a="prompsit2adn"><i>IP</i><par n="MTS__n"/></e>
<e lm="ACM" a="prompsit2adn"><i>ACM</i><par n="ATS__n"/></e>
<e lm="PDA" a="prompsit2adn"><i>PDA</i><par n="IRPF__n"/></e>
<e lm="DJ" a="prompsit2adn"><i>DJ</i><par n="ATS__n"/></e>
<e lm="VPO" a="prompsit2adn"><i>VPO</i><par n="MTS__n"/></e>
<e lm="FAPAE" a="prompsit2adn"><i>FAPAE</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="DC" a="prompsit2adn"><i>DC</i><par n="ATS__n"/></e>
<e lm="SUMMA" a="prompsit2adn"><i>SUMMA</i><par n="BBVA__n"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="si" a="prompsit2adn"><i>si</i><par n="fi__n"/></e>
<e lm="pupil" a="prompsit2adn"><i>pupil</i><par n="gal__n"/></e>
<e lm="encens" a="prompsit"><i>encens</i><par n="campus__n"/></e>
<e lm="batlle" a="prompsit"><i>batlle</i><par n="alcalde__n"/></e>
<e lm="estisores" a="prompsit"><i>estisores</i><par n="escombraries__n"/></e>
<e lm="NIF" a="prompsit"><i>NIF</i><par n="IRPF__n"/></e>
<e lm="CCAA" a="prompsit"><i>CCAA</i><par n="FARC__n"/></e>
<e lm="un quart de cinc"><i>un<b/>quart<b/>de<b/>cinc</i><par n="q__n"/></e>
<e lm="set." a="prompsit2cdl" r="RL" c="RL per ara per problemes d'anàlisi del punt"><i>set.</i><par n="atletisme__n"/></e>
<e lm="pres"><i>pres</i><par n="pres__n"/></e>
<e lm="cantirer"><i>cantirer</i><par n="senyor__n"/></e>
<e lm="dta."><i>dta.</i><par n="q__n"/></e>
<e lm="el·lipsi"><i>el·lipsi</i><par n="accessibilitat__n"/></e>
<e lm="ni una cosa ni l'altra" r="RL"><i>ni<b/>una<b/>cosa<b/>ni<b/>l'altra</i><par n="càries__n"/></e>
<e lm="portamonedes"><i>portamonedes</i><par n="campus__n"/></e>
<e lm="bossa de roba"><p><l>bosses<b/>de<b/>roba</l><r>bossa<b/>de<b/>roba</r></p><par n="escombraries__n"/></e>
<e lm="treball de recerca"><i>treball<b/>de<b/>recerca</i><par n="atletisme__n"/></e>
<e lm="1a." a="mireiafarrus"><i>1a.</i><par n="q__n"/></e>
